Hawaii statutes.
§431L-4 Employer obligations. Where a
parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health
coverage, which is available through an employer doing business in this State,
the employer is required:

(1) To permit the parent to enroll under family
coverage, as defined in section 431:10A-103 or reciprocal beneficiary family
coverage, as defined in section 431:10A-601, any child who is otherwise
eligible for coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;

(2) If the parent is enrolled but fails to make
application to obtain coverage of the child, to enroll the child under family
coverage or reciprocal beneficiary family coverage upon application by the
child's other parent, by the state agency administering the medicaid program,
or by the state agency administering the child support enforcement program;

(3) Not to disenroll (or eliminate coverage of) any
such child unless the employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

(A) The court or administrative order is no
longer in effect;

(B) The child is or will be enrolled in
comparable coverage which will take effect no later than the effective date of
disenrollment; or

(C) The employer has eliminated family health
coverage or reciprocal beneficiary family coverage for all of its employees;
and

(4) To withhold from the employee's compensation the
employee's share (if any) of premiums for health coverage and to pay this
amount to the insurer. [L 1995, c 83, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 383, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next